Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2518.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 301B of Title 44, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Oklahoma Military Department to be designated the "Base
Infrastructure Needs and Development - Technology Revolving Fund",
which may also be cited as "BIND – Technology Fund". The fund shall
be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and
shall consist of all monies directed for deposit to the fund by law.
All monies accruing to the credit of said fund are hereby

appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Oklahoma
Military Department for the purpose established in subsection B of
this section. Expenditures from said fund shall be made upon
warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as
prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
B. There is hereby established within the Oklahoma Military
Department the "Base Infrastructure Needs and Development –
Technology Program", which may also be cited as the "BIND –
Technology Program". The Department shall utilize funds from the
BIND – Technology Fund created in subsection A of this section,
alone or in combination with other available funding, to make
infrastructure investments, including, but not limited to, the
purchase of licenses and software associated with military
simulation training, that will either:
1. Decrease the likelihood of military base and other military
infrastructure closures in this state; or
2. Increase the likelihood of military base and other military
infrastructure expansions in this state.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2518 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2518 Page 3